Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF14.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1725YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 14 Section 1. Section 124.201, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. Notwithstanding section 124.204, 3 subsection 4, a drug that contains the pharmaceutical 4 composition of crystalline polymorph psilocybin, also known as 5 COMP 360, or any other trade name approved by the United States 6 food and drug administration, shall be immediately removed 7 from schedule I under section 124.204, subsection 4, paragraph 8 âsâ , upon its approval by the United States food and drug 9 administration and rescheduled based upon the recommendations 10 of the United States food and drug administration and its 11 listing in the federal Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. 12 Â§812, and 21 C.F.R. Â§1308.14. 13 b. Immediately upon the rescheduling of the drug under 14 paragraph âaâ , it shall be lawful to prescribe, distribute, and 15 market the pharmaceutical composition of crystalline polymorph 16 psilocybin, also known as COMP 360, or any other trade name 17 approved by the United States food and drug administration. 18